src/fst/incoming/verb_stems.lexc
LEXICON DITR-yi-PROG
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROGRESSIVE@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON IMP-nis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON IMP-nis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON IMP-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON IMP-yis-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.IMPERSONAL@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yis-yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-CHECK-TAMA-CHECK-ASPECT
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.@@U.TAMA.CHECK-TAMA@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0i-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0i@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0s-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0s@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-i-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.i@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-ii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.ii@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-is-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.is@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-isi-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.isi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-ni-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-nii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nii@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-nis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-si-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-sis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.sis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.SUPERASPECT.REPETITIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-0s-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.SUPERASPECT.REPETITIVE@@U.TAMA.%0s@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-isi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.isi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-ni-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-nii-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nii@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-nis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-sii-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.sii@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-sis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.sis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-a-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yis-a-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yis-a@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yis-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yis-yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-yi-PFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.SUPERASPECT.REPETITIVE@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yis-yi-PFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.SUPERASPECT.REPETITIVE@@U.TAMA.yis-yi@@U.VV.S@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-POT
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.POTENTIAL@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yis-POT
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.POTENTIAL@@U.TAMA.yis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yi-PROG
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROGRESSIVE@@U.TAMA.yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-yis-PROG
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.PROGRESSIVE@@U.TAMA.yis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON -0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE-SUBJ3ONLY@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON -si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE-SUBJ3ONLY@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON -yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE-SUBJ3ONLY@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-S3SG-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE-SUBJ3SGONLY@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-S3SG-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE-SUBJ3SGONLY@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON INTR-SS-nis-PFV
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE-SUBJSUPPR@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-CHECK-TAMA-CHECK-ASPECT
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.@@U.TAMA.CHECK-TAMA@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-0s-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0s@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-i-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.i@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-nis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-isi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.isi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBL-yis-PROG
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@@U.ASPECT.PROGRESSIVE@@U.TAMA.yis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-CHECK-TAMA-CHECK-ASPECT
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECTEXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.@@U.TAMA.CHECK-TAMA@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECTEXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-ii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECTEXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.ii@@U.VV.I@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-nis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECTEXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-0-IPFV-REP
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECTEXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.SUPERASPECT.REPETITIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-ni-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECTEXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-si-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECTEXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON OBLEXP-yi-yi-PFV
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECTEXPERIENCER@@U.ASPECT.PERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.yi-yi@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-TR-nis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIONALTRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nis@@U.VV.%0@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-CHECK-TAMA-CHECK-ASPECT
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.@@U.TAMA.CHECK-TAMA@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-0-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-0s-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.%0s@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-i-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.i@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.ii@@U.VV.I@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-is-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.is@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-ni-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.ni@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-nii-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nii@@U.VV.I@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-nis-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.nis@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON TR-si-IPFV
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@@U.ASPECT.IMPERFECTIVE@@U.TAMA.si@@U.VV.%0@@R.CONATIVE.OFF@ VerbSuffixes;

LEXICON Intransitive
diik'ol[be_white]:di.k’ol	INTR-nii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os02594
dītsūw[be_yellow]:dī.tsūw	INTR-nii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os01035, os01036, os01037
gūníízh[tell_stories]:gū_níízh	INTR-ii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os05104, os05105, os05106, os05107, os05108, os05109, os05110, os05111
màdīsmòn[make_vibration]:mà=dī.mòn	INTR-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os06840
nànó[arrive_and_camp]:nà=nó	INTR-nii-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07922, os07923, os07924
nàts'īd[fall]:nà=ts'īd	INTR-yis-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os11798
nàzíts'íy[be_heard]:nà=zí.ts'íy	INTR-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os04358, os04359, os04360, os04361, os04362, os04363, os04364
nágūdīskò[track_again]:niná=gū_dī.kòy	INTR-yi-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os08517
nágūníízh[tell_stories]:ná=gū_nììzh	INTR-ii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os05117
nánīk'ós[cool_off]:ná.k'ós	INTR-ni-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os02584
nánīk'ós[cool_off]:ná.k'òòz	INTR-ni-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02585
nástsīl[get_drenched]:ná=tsīl	INTR-sis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os02216, os02217, os02218, os02219
nááyi[melt]:ná=yi	INTR-0i-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os03004, os03005, os03006
nááyi[melt]:ná=yí	INTR-sii-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os03007
nísk'òòz[wind_blow_cold]:k'òòz	INTR-nis-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os06056
nākàtłód[come_down_quickly]:nākà=tłód	INTR-nis-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06667, os06668
nīts'īł[close_eyes]:nánī.ts'īłsh	INTR-0-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os06513
nītsíghádīt'ás[howl]:nītsíghá=dī.t'as	INTR-yi-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06703, os06704
sitín[sit]:tín	INTR-sis-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os05434
sīdlúw[be_cold]:dlúw	INTR-si-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os12096
tadáł[many_go_wrong_place]:ta=dál	INTR-yis-yi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os08788
ts'ásáyīnīk'ós[straighten_out]:ts'ásá=yī.k'ós	INTR-yi-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os12114, os12115
tàlàtà[many_lie_face_up]:tàlà=ni.tááz	INTR-si-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os04009
tātł'ash[dance]:tā=tł'ash	INTR-0i-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os00929
ìwún[be_ready]:wún	INTR-isi-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os03309, os03310, os03311, os03312, os03313, os03314, os03315
ìzhíłzh[shout_once]:zhíłt	INTR-isi-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os06826
ídīskīd[ask_O]:ná=í_dī.kīīzh	INTR-yis-yi-PFV-REP ; ! Perfective + Repetitive ! OS: os05504
ídīswúsh[whistle]:í=dī.wúsh	INTR-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os06722, os06723, os06724, os06725, os06726, os06727, os06728, os06739, os06740
ík'àts'īdlī[be_stingy]:ík'àts'ī=dlī	INTR-ni-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os10400, os10401, os10402, os10403, os10404, os10405, os10406, os10411
ísnō[eat_O]:nō	INTR-is-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os01694, os01695, os01696, os01697, os01698, os01699, os01700
ít'ùd[smoke]:í.t'ùd	INTR-is-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os07024, os07025, os07026
īdó[drink]:dó	INTR-i-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os09123, os09124
īdīsnít[whistle]:ī=dī.nít	INTR-yis-POT ; ! Potential ! OS: os06717, os06719
īdīsá[chase_something]:ī=dī.sáł	INTR-yi-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os06546, os06547
īsdóyináł[be_tired]:īsdó=náł	INTR-yis-PROG ; ! Progressive ! OS: os06491, os06492, os06493
īstsìn[defecate]:ná=chish	INTR-0s-IPFV-REP ; ! Imperfective + Repetitive ! OS: os06855
ītsàd[eat_something]:tsàd	INTR-yi-a-PFV ; ! Perfective ! OS: os07453, os07455
ītł'ùw[get_moldy]:tł'ùw	INTR-i-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os03054
īīyá[play_out]:īī=yā	INTR-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os08797
LEXICON Transitive
sītí[one_sleep]:tí	TR-si-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os08864, os08865
átłàdīnītī[close_with_SO]:átłà=dì.tī	TR-ni-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os02524
ìtsàł[hit_with_RO]:tsìłt	TR-i-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os10980, os10981
ích'ún[be_cautious_of_O]:í.ch'ún	TR-nii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os09238, os09239, os09240, os09241, os09244
ídīłù[drive]:í=dī.łù[drive]	TR-0-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os04471, os04472, os04473, os04474, os04475, os04476
íswùsh[tickle_O]:í.wūsh	TR-0s-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os04984
ísxàł[club_O]:í.xàł	TR-nis-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os04207
íízùd[swallow_O]:zùd	TR-ii-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os04830
īsmós[boil_O]:í_mós	TR-is-IPFV ; ! Imperfective ! OS: os02402
